Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6312
Violations; penalties.

(1) An individual or business entity which engages in an asbestos project without a valid license, except as otherwise provided in the Asbestos Control Act, shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than five thousand dollars nor more than twenty-five thousand dollars for the first offense and not less than twenty-five thousand dollars nor more than one hundred thousand dollars for a second or subsequent offense. Each day a violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.

(2) An individual who engages in an asbestos occupation without a valid license, except as otherwise provided in the act, shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars for the first offense and not less than one thousand dollars nor more than fifteen thousand dollars for the second or subsequent offense. Each day a violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.

(3) Any business entity which knowingly engages in an asbestos project but which uses employees who do not hold a license shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars for the first offense and not less than five thousand dollars nor more than ten thousand dollars for a second or subsequent offense. Each day a violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.

(4) The civil penalties prescribed in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section shall be assessed in a civil action brought for such purpose by the Attorney General in the district court of the county in which the violation occurred.

(5) An individual or business entity which has been assessed a civil penalty under this section and subsequently engages in an asbestos project or an asbestos occupation without a valid license or using employees who do not hold a license, except as otherwise provided in the Asbestos Control Act:

(a) For a first offense, shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor; and

(b) For a second or subsequent offense, shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1986, LB 1051, § 12;

Laws 1988, LB 1073, § 10;

Laws 1990, LB 923, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1255.